Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.180

Liability of executor de son tort.

No person is liable to an action as executor of his or her own wrong for having taken, received, or interfered with the property of a deceased person, but is responsible to the personal representatives of such deceased person for the value of all property so taken or received, and for all injury caused by his or her interference with the estate of the deceased.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2041; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.180. Prior: Code 1881 s 722; 1877 p 146 s 726; 1869 p 166 s 663; RRS s 971.]